Wisconsin, session 2025, SB625.
do enact as follows:SB625,13Section 1. Fiscal changes.SB625,2,54(1) Municipality reimbursements for in-person absentee voting office 5hours. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the joint 6committee on finance under s. 20.865 (4) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-126 is increased by $10,000,000 for the department of administration to pay 2reimbursements to municipalities at a rate provided by law for a certain number of 3hours the municipality’s municipal clerk’s office or alternate site under s. 6.855 is 4required by law to remain open for in-person absentee voting at a spring election, as 5defined in s. 5.02 (21) or a general election, as defined in s. 5.02 (5).SB625,2,66